Utah statutes.
63B-7-501.   Revenue bond authorizations.

(1) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Building Ownership Authority, under the authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $1,568,600 for the construction of a Utah Correctional Industries Facility at the Central Utah Correctional Facility at Gunnison, together with additional amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service requirements.

(b)  The State Building Ownership Authority shall work cooperatively with the Department of Corrections to seek out the most cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available.

(c)  It is the intent of the Legislature that program revenues be used as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this Subsection (1).

(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the State Board of Regents, on behalf of the University of Utah, issue, sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of the University of Utah to borrow money on the credit, income, and revenues of the University of Utah, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the cost of constructing, furnishing, and equipping student housing;

(b)  University funds and housing rental revenues be used as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this Subsection (2); and

(c)  the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this Subsection (2) may provide up to $86,000,000 together with other amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the State Board of Regents on behalf of the University of Utah issue, sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of the University of Utah to borrow money on the credit, income, and revenues of the University of Utah, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the cost of constructing, furnishing, and equipping a Health Sciences Parking Structure;

(b)  University funds and parking revenues be used as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this Subsection (3); and

(c)  the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this Subsection (3) may provide up to $12,000,000, together with other amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(4)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the State Board of Regents, on behalf of the University of Utah, issue, sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of the University of Utah to borrow money on the credit and income and revenues of the University of Utah, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the cost of constructing, furnishing, and equipping a Southwest Campus Parking Structure;

(b)  University funds and parking revenues be used as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this Subsection (4); and

(c)  the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this Subsection (4) may provide up to $7,200,000, together with other amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(5)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the State Board of Regents, on behalf of the University of Utah, issue, sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of the University of Utah to borrow money on the credit and income and revenues of the University of Utah, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the cost of constructing, furnishing, and equipping an expansion of the Eccles Broadcast Center;

(b)  University funds and service revenues be used as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this Subsection (5); and

(c)  the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this Subsection (5) may provide up to $5,100,000, together with other amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(6)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the State Board of Regents, on behalf of the University of Utah, issue, sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of the University of Utah to borrow money on the credit and income and revenues of the University of Utah, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the cost of constructing, furnishing, equipping, and remodeling facilities for perinatal services, adult critical care services, clinical training and support, and upgrade of the University Hospital Rehabilitation Unit, and for purchase of the University Neuropsychiatric Institute and Summit Health Center in Park West;

(b)  University Hospital revenues be used as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this Subsection (6); and

(c)  the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this Subsection (6) may provide up to $23,300,000 together with other amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(7)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the State Board of Regents, on behalf of Weber State University, issue, sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of Weber State University to borrow money on the credit and income and revenues of Weber State University, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the cost of constructing, furnishing, and equipping student housing;

(b)  University funds and housing rental revenues be used as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this Subsection (7); and

(c)  the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this Subsection (7) may provide up to $19,000,000 together with other amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(8) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Building Ownership Authority, under the authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $1,100,000 for the construction of surplus property facilities for the Division of Fleet Operations, together with additional amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(b)  The State Building Ownership Authority shall work cooperatively with the Department of Administrative Services to seek out the most cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available.

(c)  It is the intent of the Legislature that Internal Service Fund revenues be used as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this Subsection (8).

(9) (a)  Contingent upon the state of Utah receiving a perfected security interest in accordance with Senate Joint Resolution 14, 1998 Annual General Session, the State Building Ownership Authority, under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $25,000,000 for the cost of constructing, furnishing, and equipping housing facilities at the University of Utah, together with additional amounts necessary to:

(i)  pay costs of issuance;

(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and

(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(b)  The State Building Ownership Authority and the University of Utah may enter into real estate arrangements and security arrangements that are:

(i)  necessary to accomplish the purposes of this Subsection (9); and

(ii)  not inconsistent with the requirements of Senate Joint Resolution 14, 1998 Annual General Session.

(10)  In order to achieve a debt service savings, it is the intent of the Legislature that the State Building Ownership Authority, under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide sufficient funding to exercise the state's option to purchase the Youth Corrections Facility in Salt Lake County currently financed by Salt Lake County.

